src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k33_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hylur
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: hyl
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: hyli
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: [hyljar, hyls]
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: hyljar
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: hyljar
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: hyljum
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: hylja
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: hylurin
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: hylin
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: hylinum
    hylur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: [hyljarins, hylsins]
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: hyljarnir
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: hyljarnar
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: hyljunum
    hylur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: hyljanna
